Maine, session 132, LD2043.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. P&SL 1963, c. 87, §17, first ¶, as amended by P&SL 2021, c. 15, §14, is
further amended to read:
Sec. 17. Authorized to borrow money and to issue bonds and notes. To
procure funds for the purposes of this Act and for such other expenses as may be necessary
for the carrying out of the purposes, the district without a district vote but by action of its
board of trustees is authorized to raise funds from sources other than operational activities
by receiving governmental aid and also by borrowing money in accordance with this
section. The district may issue its notes and bonds in one series or in separate series from
time to time, as long as the aggregate outstanding principal balance at any one time does
not exceed $12,000,000 $17,000,000, unless a higher debt obligation limit is established
pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 38, section 1054, except that the district may
employ the procedures set forth in Title 30-A, section 2354 as an alternative to the
procedures in Title 30-A, chapter 121.
Page 1 - 132LR2825(03)